Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB48.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1352.3. Arts registration plate.The department, in consultation with the Council on the Arts, shall design a special arts registration plate. Upon application of any person, accompanied by a fee of $41, which shall be in addition to the annual registration fee, the department shall issue the plate for a passenger car, motor home, trailer or truck with a registered gross weight of not more than 14,000 pounds. The Arts Promotion Fund established in section 1905(e) (relating to payments to special funds) shall receive $15 of the fee paid by the applicant for the plate.Section 2. Section 1905 of Title 75 is amended by adding a 12345678910111213141516171819 subsection to read:§ 1905. Payments to special funds.* * *(e) Arts Promotion Fund.-- (1) The Arts Promotion Fund is established within the State Treasury for the purpose of providing grants for the arts.(2) Fifteen dollars of each fee received under section 1352.3 (relating to arts registration plate) shall be credited to the Arts Promotion Fund.(3) All money in the Arts Promotion Fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the Council on the Arts and may be expended, subject to paragraph (5), for the purposes authorized under this subsection.(4) Estimates of amounts to be expended under this subsection shall be submitted to the Governor by the Council on the Arts for approval.(5) The State Treasurer may not honor any requisition for expenditures by the Council on the Arts in excess of estimates approved by the Governor or in excess of the amount available for the purposes for which the requisition was made, whichever is the lesser amount.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0048PN0027 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223